Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1439.01
Motor vehicle provided by motor
vehicle dealer; motor vehicle insurance policies; primary coverage; secondary
coverage.

During
the time when an insured person is operating a motor vehicle provided by a
motor vehicle dealer for use while the insured person's motor vehicle is being
serviced, repaired, or inspected by the motor vehicle dealer, when both the
insured person's and motor vehicle dealer's motor vehicle insurance policies
have a mutually repugnant clause regarding primary coverage, the insured person's
motor vehicle insurance policy shall provide primary coverage for the motor
vehicle and the motor vehicle insurance policy of the motor vehicle dealer
shall provide secondary coverage until the motor vehicle is returned to the
motor vehicle dealer. This section only applies to the loan of a motor vehicle
by a motor vehicle dealer which occurs without financial remuneration in the
form of a fee or lease charge paid directly by the insured person operating
the motor vehicle. Payments made by any third party to a motor vehicle dealer,
or similar reimbursements, shall not be considered payments directly from
the insured person operating the motor vehicle.

Laws 2013, LB133, § 2.